apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="aanl/open__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iepen</l>     <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iep</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iep</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iep</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>opend</l>     <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oop</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oopt</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oopt</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>oop</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oopt</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iepen</l>     <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iep</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iep</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iep</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oop</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oopt</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oopt</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ope</l>       <r>open<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aann/emen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>emen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emend</l>     <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eem</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eemt</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eemt</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>eem</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eemt</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eem</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eemt</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eemt</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emen</l>      <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eme</l>       <r>emen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="aanlopen">        <i>aanl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aanlopen">        <p><l>l</l>         <r>aanl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>aan</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="aannemen">        <i>aann</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aannemen">        <p><l>n</l>         <r>aann</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>aan</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="waarnemen">       <i>waarn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="waarnemen">       <p><l>n</l>         <r>waarn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>waar</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="deelnemen">       <i>deeln</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="deelnemen">       <p><l>n</l>         <r>deeln</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>deel</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="aflopen">         <i>afl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aflopen">         <p><l>l</l>         <r>afl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="afnemen">         <i>afn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afnemen">         <p><l>n</l>         <r>afn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="doorlopen">       <i>doorl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="doorlopen">       <p><l>l</l>         <r>doorl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>door</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="inlopen">         <i>inl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="inlopen">         <p><l>l</l>         <r>inl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="innemen">         <i>inn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="innemen">         <p><l>n</l>         <r>inn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="omlopen">         <i>oml</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="omlopen">         <p><l>l</l>         <r>oml</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>om</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="overlopen">       <i>overl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="overlopen">       <p><l>l</l>         <r>overl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="overnemen">       <i>overn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="overnemen">       <p><l>n</l>         <r>overn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="oplopen">         <i>opl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="oplopen">         <p><l>l</l>         <r>opl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="opnemen">         <i>opn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="opnemen">         <p><l>n</l>         <r>opn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="samenlopen">      <i>samenl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="samenlopen">      <p><l>l</l>         <r>samenl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>samen</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="samennemen">      <i>samenn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="samennemen">      <p><l>n</l>         <r>samenn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>samen</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="terugnemen">      <i>terugn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="terugnemen">      <p><l>n</l>         <r>terugn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>terug</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="toelopen">        <i>toel</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="toelopen">        <p><l>l</l>         <r>toel</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>toe</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="toenemen">        <i>toen</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="toenemen">        <p><l>n</l>         <r>toen</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>toe</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="uitlopen">        <i>uitl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uitlopen">        <p><l>l</l>         <r>uitl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>uit</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="uitnemen">        <i>uitn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uitnemen">        <p><l>n</l>         <r>uitn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>uit</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="voorlopen">       <i>voorl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="voorlopen">       <p><l>l</l>         <r>voorl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>voor</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="voornemen">       <i>voorn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="voornemen">       <p><l>n</l>         <r>voorn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>voor</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="weglopen">        <i>wegl</i><par n="aanl/open__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="weglopen">        <p><l>l</l>         <r>wegl</r></p><par n="l/open#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>weg</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="wegnemen">        <i>wegn</i><par n="aann/emen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="wegnemen">        <p><l>n</l>         <r>wegn</r></p><par n="n/emen#_aan__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>weg</l><r></r></p></e>
